Tennessee, session 114, SB0022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-21-1004(e), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(e) When appropriate, the members of the board and the board's employees
shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary travel expenses in accordance with
the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and
administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0022
000641
- 1 -